California statutes. Harbors and Navigation Code
 department shall adopt regulations to carry out this section, including approval of boating safety education courses, as specified in Section 668.3, prescribing the forms for proof of completion and passage, approval of testing to indicate appropriate mastery of the course subject matter, and setting forth any fees to be charged to course participants, which fees shall not exceed the expenses associated with providing the course.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 610, Sec. 35.   (SB 717)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

668.2.

The department may grant funds from the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund to local public agencies, nonprofit organizations, and colleges and universities for scholarship funding relating to boating safety education, to finance the purchase of vessels and related safety equipment for use in boating safety education classes, and to provide voluntary personal watercraft education course materials developed by the department pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 668.3 in those situations where the department determines the course would not otherwise be available to a significant number of personal watercraft operators. The department shall adopt regulations necessary to implement this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 396, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

668.3.

(a) For the purposes of Section 668.1, the department shall approve boating safety courses that it determines provides the course taker with information that effectively educates the course taker as to the basic rules of California waterways, the proper and safe manner to operate recreational vessels, and actions that can be taken to avoid boating-related environmental pollution.

(b) The department shall develop a personal watercraft education course that provides the course taker with information that effectively educates the course taker as to the basic rules of California waterways, the proper and safe manner to operate personal watercraft, and actions that can be taken to avoid personal watercraft-related environmental pollution. The course shall be voluntary and shall be made available to groups, individuals, and clubs. The course shall be made available on the department’s website and may be made available in other formats, as determined by the department. The department shall consult with the California State Sheriff’s Association in developing the course and making it available on the Internet.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 396, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

668.5.

(a) The interest of any registered owner of a vessel that has been used in the commission of a violation of subdivision (b) of Section 655 for which the owner was convicted and the conduct resulted in the unlawful killing of a person is subject to impoundment as provided in this section. Upon conviction, the court may order the vessel impounded at the registered owner’s expense for a period of not less than one nor more than 30 days.

(b) For purposes of this section, the court may consider in the interest of justice factors such as whether the impoundment of the vessel would result in the loss of employment of the registered owner of the vessel who committed the violation, or
 a member of the registered owner’s family, the loss of the vessel resulting from the inability to pay impoundment fees, unfair infringement upon community property rights, or other factors the court finds to be relevant.

(c) For purposes of this section, “vessel” means every watercraft used or capable of being used as a means of transportation on the waters of the state, including all boats, motorboats, personal watercraft, recreational vessels, and unregistered vehicles, except for foreign and domestic vessels engaged in interstate or foreign commerce upon the waters of the state.

(d) A marina owner in possession of an impounded vessel pursuant to this section is not liable for damage to the vessel while the vessel is being impounded by the court, except for damage caused by the marina owner’s acts or omissions constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 644, Sec. 1.   (SB 393)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

669.

The regulations adopted by the department pursuant to this chapter shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

673.

The owner of a boat livery shall cause to be kept a record of the name and address of the person or persons hiring any boat or vessel subject to this code, the registered identification number of such vessel, the departure date and time, and the expected time of return. The record shall be preserved for at least six months.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 744.)
-------------------------------------------

674.

Neither the owner of a boat livery nor his agent or employees shall permit any vessel to be delivered to a renter unless it shall have been provided, either by the owner or renter, with the equipment required pursuant to the applicable laws and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.3. Invasive Mussel Infestation Prevention Fee [675. - 677.5.]

675.

(a) (1) In addition to the fees imposed pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 9853 or Section 9860 of the Vehicle Code, there shall be a separate invasive mussel infestation prevention fee in an amount to be determined by the department as follows:

(A) If the invasive mussel infestation prevention fee is due between January 1 and December 31 of any even-numbered year, the fee shall not be more than ten dollars ($10).

(B) If the invasive mussel infestation prevention fee is due between January 1 and December 31 of any odd-numbered year, the fee shall not be more than twenty
 dollars ($20).

(2) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), for invasive mussel prevention fees that are due for the 2026 calendar year, and every subsequent year thereafter, the following shall apply:

(i) If the invasive mussel infestation prevention fee is due between January 1 and December 31 of any even-numbered year, the fee shall not be less than fifteen dollars ($15) and not more than twenty-one dollars ($21).

(ii) If the invasive mussel infestation prevention fee is due between January 1 and December 31 of any odd-numbered year, the fee shall not be less than thirty dollars ($30) and not more than forty-two dollars ($42).

(B) The amounts in clauses (i) and (ii) shall be adjusted for inflation every odd-numbered year using the California Consumer Price Index to the nearest whole dollar value.

(b) In determining the amount of the fee imposed pursuant to subdivision (a), the department shall establish, and consult with, a technical advisory group consisting of interested persons, including, but not limited to, recreational boating and reservoir operation representatives. The members of the advisory group shall be appointed by the director.

(c) The department shall adopt emergency regulations to prescribe procedures for the collection and use of the
 invasive mussel infestation prevention fee for the purposes of this article. The emergency regulations shall include rules for administering the grants awarded pursuant to Section 676.

(d) All revenues collected from the fee established pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund, and, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be expended solely for the purposes set forth in Section 676.

(e) The fee established pursuant to this section shall not apply to vessels that are used exclusively in marine waters.

(1) Upon payment of the fee established pursuant to this section, the Department of Motor Vehicles shall issue an invasive mussel infestation prevention sticker.

(2) Failure to pay the fee established pursuant to this section does not prohibit the Department of Motor Vehicles from issuing registration of a vessel.

(3) (A) A vessel operator may be issued a citation for operating a recreational vessel in nonmarine waters without a valid state-issued invasive mussel infestation prevention sticker.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a vessel that is exempt pursuant to Section 5211 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations shall not be cited pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 106, Sec. 7.   (AB 149)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

676.

(a) All moneys deposited in the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 675 shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the following purposes:

(1) For reasonable costs incurred by the department associated with determining the prevention fee and adoption of regulations pursuant to Section 675, and with administering the grants pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) (A) For reasonable costs, not to exceed 15 percent of the remaining revenues deposited into the fund, of the Department of Fish and Wildlife for implementation of subparagraph (A) or (C) of paragraph (2)
 of, or paragraph (1) of, subdivision (a) of Section 2301 or Section 2302 of the Fish and Game Code in those areas of the state where an invasive mussel infestation prevention plan has not been implemented.

(B) The amount specified in subparagraph (A) is in addition to moneys available pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 85.2.

(3) An amount not less than 85 percent of the remaining revenues deposited into the fund shall be made available for grants to entities subject to subdivision (a) of Section 2302 of the Fish and Game Code for the reasonable regulatory costs incident to the implementation of an invasive mussel infestation prevention plan implemented either before or after January 1, 2013, that is consistent with the requirements of Section 2302 of the Fish and Game Code.

(b) For the purposes of awarding grants pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), the department shall do all of the following:

(1) Give priority to invasive mussel infestation prevention plans that are consistent with Section 2302 of the Fish and Game Code and that also include visual and manual inspection standards and other infestation prevention procedures consistent with either the Department of Fish and Wildlife’s Invasive Mussel Guidebook for Recreational Water Managers and Users, dated September 2010, or the Natural Resource Agency’s Aquatic Invasive Species Management Plan, dated January 2008, or subsequently adopted guidebooks and management plans.

(2) Take into consideration the benefits of regional-scale
 invasive mussel infestation prevention plans.

(3) Take into consideration the unique economic, ecological, and recreational impacts to rural and urban reservoirs from
 invasive mussel infestation.

(c) For purposes of this article, reasonable regulatory costs include costs associated with the investigation and inspection of a conveyance for the presence of invasive mussels before contact with a reservoir, as defined in Section 6004.5 of the Water Code. None of the revenues collected pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 675 shall be used for any purpose other than those explicitly authorized by this section.

(d) For the purposes of this section, conveyances include boats and other watercraft, and associated vehicles, containers, and trailers that may carry or contain adult or larval invasive mussels.

(e) As a condition of receiving grant funding pursuant to this section,
 an entity shall report to the department data, as deemed appropriate by the department, regarding invasive mussel prevention and inspection programs implemented with the funding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 106, Sec. 8.   (AB 149)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

676.1.

Any person or entity that manages any aspect of the water in a reservoir, as defined in Section 6004.5 of the Water Code, where recreational, boating, or fishing activities are permitted, shall be eligible to receive a grant under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 676 for the reasonable regulatory costs incident to the implementation of an invasive mussel infestation prevention plan as described in Section 676.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 106, Sec. 9.   (AB 149)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

677.

This article does not preempt a special district, city, county, or joint powers authority from adopting local regulations or ordinances related to the prevention and eradication of invasive aquatic species.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 485, Sec. 2.   (AB 2443)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

677.5.

For purposes of this article, “invasive mussel” has the same meaning as Section 2303 of the Fish and Game Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 106, Sec. 10.   (AB 149)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.4. Vessel Operators’ Education and Certification Cards [678. - 678.15.]

678.

(a) On or before January 1, 2018, the division shall develop a vessel operator card to be issued pursuant to this article.

(b) The division shall issue, or cause to be issued, a vessel operator card to a person who provides the division with proof that the person has passed a vessel operator examination approved by the division or a vessel operator course that includes an examination and is approved by the division pursuant to Section 668.1 or 668.3.

(c) A vessel operator card shall be valid for the life of the person to whom it is issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 433, Sec. 1.   (SB 941)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

678.3.

(a) (1) The division shall determine the fees required under this section in amounts sufficient to cover the reasonable costs of the development, establishment, and operation of the program. The fees shall not exceed those costs.

(2) The division shall charge a fee not to exceed thirty dollars ($30) for the initial vessel operator card issued pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 678.

(3) The division shall charge a fee not to exceed ten dollars ($10) for a duplicate vessel operator card issued pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 678.

(b) In determining the amount of the
 fees imposed pursuant to this section, the division shall establish, and consult with, a technical advisory group consisting of interested persons, including, but not limited to, representatives of the boating community. The deputy director shall appoint the members of the advisory group.

(c) The fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Vessel Operator Certification Account, which is hereby established within the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund.

(d) The division may expend the moneys in the Vessel Operator Certification Account, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for purposes of implementing this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 241.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

678.5.

(a) The division may develop and provide a vessel operator examination on the division’s Internet Web site. The division shall provide links from the division’s Internet Web site to other vessel operator examinations approved by the division that are available through a provider whose course has been approved by the National Association of State Boating Law Administrators.

(b) If the division contracts for the provision of vessel operator examination services with test vendors, the division shall conduct a formal competitive bid process and shall contract with more than one vendor for those services.

(c) A vessel operator examination developed or approved by the division shall be consistent with the National Association of State Boating Law Administrators’ National Boating Education Standards, as applicable to basic vessel operations, rules of navigation, and boating safety only.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 433, Sec. 1.   (SB 941)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

678.7.

(a) An amount not to exceed four million dollars ($4,000,000) shall, upon appropriation in the annual Budget Act, be transferred from the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund to the Vessel Operator Certification Account in the form of a loan to be used by the division to develop and establish the program under this article.

(b) The division shall repay the loan described in subdivision (a) from fees received pursuant to Section 678.3 within eight years of the effective date of this article.

(c) If the division has not repaid the loan within the time period specified in subdivision (b), the division shall
 notify the Joint
 Legislative Budget Committee.

(d) The loan shall not impair the intended expenditure purposes of the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 433, Sec. 1.   (SB 941)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

678.9.

(a) On or before April 1, 2019, and on or before April 1 annually thereafter, the division shall prepare a report that includes all of the following information with respect to the prior calendar year:

(1) The total number of vessel operator cards issued pursuant to this article.

(2) The fees collected, and the costs incurred, by the division pursuant to this article.

(3) The correlation between vessel operator cards issued and the number of accidents, injuries, and fatalities related to the operation of vessels in the state that are
 reported pursuant to Section 656.

(4) The number of violations of this article reported to the division.

(b) The report shall be posted on the division’s Internet Web site.

(c) On or before April 1, 2023, and again on April 1, 2028, the report prepared by the division and posted on its Internet Web site shall include recommendations, developed by the division, in consultation with the technical advisory group established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 678.3, relating to any program changes to improve boater safety in California or, alternatively, reasons why the program should not be continued.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 433, Sec. 1.   (SB 941)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

678.11.

(a) Subject to the schedule in subdivision (b), a person shall not operate on waters subject to the jurisdiction of the state a vessel that is propelled by an engine, regardless of whether the engine is the principal source of propulsion, unless the person has in his or her possession a vessel operator card issued by the division pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 678.

(b) A person is subject to subdivision (a) according to the following schedule:

(1) On and after January 1, 2018: A person 20 years of age or younger.

(2) On and after
 January 1, 2019: A person 25 years of age or younger.

(3) On and after January 1, 2020: A person 35 years of age or younger.

(4) On and after January 1, 2021: A person 40 years of age or younger.

(5) On and after January 1, 2022: A person 45 years of age or younger.

(6) On and after January 1, 2023: A person 50 years of age or younger.

(7) On and after January 1, 2024: A person 60 years of age or younger.

(8) On and after January 1, 2025: All persons, regardless of age.

(c) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) A person who is a resident of another state or a foreign country who is operating a vessel and meets either of the following requirements:

(A) The person is temporarily using the waters of this state for a period not to exceed 60 days, and meets the applicable requirements, if any, of his or her state of residency.

(B) The person is temporarily using the waters of this state for a period not to exceed 90 days, and meets the applicable requirements, if any, of his or her country of residency.

(2) A person operating a vessel while under the direct supervision of a person 18 years of age or older who is
 in possession of a vessel operator card issued pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 678 or who is not required to possess a vessel operator card pursuant to paragraph (6).

(3) A person operating a vessel in an organized regatta or vessel race, or water ski race.

(4) A person operating a rental vessel.

(5) A person who is in possession of a current commercial fishing license.

(6) A person who is in possession of a valid marine operator license, for the waters upon which the licensee is operating, issued by the United States Coast Guard, or who is in possession of a valid certificate issued pursuant to the International Convention on
 Standards of Training, Certification and Watchkeeping for Seafarers, 1978, as amended.

(7) A person who has successfully completed a boating course approved by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 433, Sec. 1.   (SB 941)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

678.15.

(a) A violation of this article is an infraction.

(b) A person convicted of an infraction for a violation of this article shall be punished as follows:

(1) For an initial conviction, by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

(2) For a second conviction, by a fine of not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(3) For a third or subsequent conviction, by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(c) A
 fine imposed on a vessel operator pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be waived, if the vessel operator provides proof that he or she had a valid vessel operator card at the time of the citation.

(d) (1) In addition to the fines imposed by subdivision (b), the court shall order a person convicted of violating this article to complete and pass a boating safety course approved by the division pursuant to Section 668.3.

(2) If a person who is ordered to complete and pass a boating safety course pursuant to paragraph (1) is 18 years of age or younger, the court may require that person to obtain the consent of a parent or guardian to enroll in that course.

(3) A person who has been ordered by a court to
 complete a boating safety course pursuant to paragraph (1) shall submit to the court proof of completion and passage of the course within seven months of the date of his or her conviction. The proof shall be in a form that has been approved by the division and that is capable of being submitted to the court or a state or local agency approved by the division through the United States Postal Service or another certified means of transmission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 433, Sec. 1.   (SB 941)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Anthony Farr and Stacy Beckett Boating Safety Act of 2004 [680. - 685.]

680.

This act shall be known as the Anthony Farr and Stacy Beckett Boating Safety Act of 2004, and may be cited as Anthony and Stacy’s Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 565, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

681.

(a) It is unlawful to operate a motorized vessel or have the engine of a motorized vessel run idle while an individual is teak surfing, platform dragging, or bodysurfing behind the motorized vessel.

(b) It is unlawful to operate a motorized vessel or have the engine of a motorized vessel run idle while an individual is occupying or holding onto the swim platform, swim deck, swim step, or swim ladder of the vessel.

(c) Subdivision (b) does not apply when an individual is occupying the swim platform, swim deck, swim step, or swim ladder for a very brief period of time while assisting with the docking or departure of the vessel, while exiting or entering the vessel, or while the vessel is engaged in law enforcement or emergency rescue activity.

(d) “Teak surfing” or “platform dragging” means holding onto the swim platform, swim deck, swim step, swim ladder, or any portion of the exterior of the transom of a motorized vessel for any amount of time while the motorized vessel is underway at any speed.

(e) “Bodysurfing” means swimming or floating on one’s stomach or on one’s back on or in the wake directly behind a motorized vessel that is underway.

(f) “Vessel” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (e) of Section 775.5.

(g) A violation of this section is an infraction punishable by a fine of up to one hundred dollars ($100). Nothing in this subdivision shall be considered in relation to a suspension, restriction, or delay of driving privileges, or in the determination of a violation point count as provided in Section 12810 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 565, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

682.

All state-sponsored boating safety courses and all boating safety courses that require state approval by the Department of Boating and Waterways shall incorporate information about the dangers of being overcome by carbon monoxide poisoning at the stern of a motorized vessel and how to prevent that poisoning.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 565, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

683.

(a) When a new or used motorized vessel is sold in California, the two carbon monoxide poisoning warning stickers developed by the Department of Boating and Waterways shall be placed on the motorized vessel. The smaller sticker shall be placed in the interior of the motorized vessel where it is immediately visible to the person operating the motorized vessel the larger sticker shall be placed facing out on the exterior of the stern or transom of the motorized vessel, unless the motorized vessel is inflatable and the sticker would not adhere to the surface of the stern.

(b) For a motorized vessel sold by a dealer, the dealer shall ensure that both warning stickers have been affixed prior to the completion of the transaction.

(c) For a motorized vessel sold by an individual, both stickers shall be included by the Department of Motor Vehicles in the new registration material provided to the new owner, and the new owner of the motorized vessel shall be notified that he or she is required to affix the smaller sticker in the interior of the motorized vessel where it is immediately visible to the operator of the motorized vessel and the larger sticker facing out on the exterior of the stern or transom of the motorized vessel, unless the motorized vessel is inflatable and the sticker would not adhere to the surface of the stern.

(d) A warning sticker already developed by the boating manufacturer may satisfy the requirements of this section if it has been approved in advance by the Department of Boating and Waterways.

(e) This section shall become operative on May 1, 2005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 565, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative May 1, 2005, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

684.

(a) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall insert the Department of Boating and Waterways’ informational brochure and warning stickers about the dangers of carbon monoxide poisoning and boats into the registration renewal materials mailed by the Department of Motor Vehicles to vessel owners for two consecutive two-year registration cycles and, thereafter, upon the recommendation of the Director of Boating and Waterways. These materials shall instruct vessel owners to place the two stickers in the motorized vessel so that the smaller sticker is visible to the person operating the motorized vessel and the larger sticker is facing out on the exterior of the stern or transom of the motorized vessel, unless the motorized vessel is inflatable and the sticker would not adhere to the surface of the stern.

(b) This section shall become operative on May 1, 2005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 565, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative May 1, 2005, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

685.

The Department of Boating and Waterways pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 85.2 may use funds in the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund, created pursuant to Section 85, to administer this chapter and to reimburse the Department of Motor Vehicles for its costs to administer this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 565, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Yacht and Ship Brokers [700. - 740.]

700.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Yacht and Ship Brokers Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

701.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions shall govern the construction of this article:

(a) “Broker” means a person who, except as otherwise excluded by Section 710, for compensation or in expectation of compensation, does, or negotiates to do, one or more of the following acts for another or others:

(1) Sells or offers to sell, buys or offers to buy, solicits or obtains listings of, or negotiates the purchase, sale, or exchange of yachts, and who does not own those yachts.

(2) Leases or rents, offers to lease or rent, places for rent, solicits a listing of a yacht for rent, or negotiates the sale, purchase, or exchange of a lease on a yacht, for a rental or lease period of more than 90 consecutive days to any one person or business during any 12-month period, and who does not own that yacht.

(b) “Salesman” refers to a natural person who, except as otherwise excluded by Section 710, for compensation or in expectation of compensation, is employed by a licensed broker to do one or more of the acts set forth in subdivision (a). The term includes “saleswoman” and “salesperson.”

(c) “Yacht” or “ship” refers to any vessel 16 feet or more in length and under 300 gross tons used for navigating in water and designed to be propelled by machinery or sail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 445, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

702.

Except as otherwise provided by law, all records of the department relating to yacht brokers and yacht salesmen shall be open to inspection by the public during regular office hours.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

702.5.

Any declaration, license, or other record electronically generated or transmitted pursuant to this article shall meet the requirements of a “record” under Title 2.5 (commencing with Section 1633.1) of Part 2 of Division 3 of the Civil Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 380, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

703.

(a) The director may, in accordance with the State Civil Service Act (commencing with Section 18500 of the Government Code), select, employ, and fix the compensation of such employees as may be necessary properly to administer this article, provided that no employee of the department shall have an interest for financial or other personal gain in the business of a licensed broker as director, stockholder, officer, member, agent, salesman, or employee.

(b) The director may prescribe the duties of all employees.

(c) The director may regulate and control the issuance, denial, suspension, and revocation, both temporary and permanent, of the licenses issued under this article.

(d) The director may perform all other acts and duties necessary for the proper enforcement of this article.

(e) The director may institute proceedings in any court of competent jurisdiction to enforce the provisions of this article by injunction or otherwise.

(f) The director or any member of the department may administer oaths for the purpose of executing this article.

(g) The director may prescribe rules and regulations to carry this article into effect in accordance with Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11371) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and may authorize the department to establish branch offices in such other cities as may be necessary for the proper administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

704.

In accordance with the provisions of Section 82 of this code, the commission shall advise the department with respect to all matters relating to the administration of this act. The department shall submit any proposed regulations or changes in regulations pertaining to this act for review and comment by the commission prior to enactment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

705.

(a) The director may adopt a seal and such other device for use by the department as it may desire, which may be used to authenticate all papers and documents required by this article which are under the control of the department. 

(b) Copies of all records and papers required by this article which are in the department’s office shall be received in evidence in all cases, when certified under the hand and seal of the department, equally and with like effect as the originals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

706.

The Attorney General shall act as the attorney for the department in all actions and proceedings pursuant to this article and shall render to the department opinions upon all questions of law arising under this article or in its administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

707.

The division shall publish or cause to be published on or before July 1 of each year a directory of licensed brokers and salespersons and shall post the directory on its Internet Web site. The division may publish such additional information as it deems expedient and may also issue a periodical bulletin concerning affairs arising under the administration of this
 article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 425, Sec. 1.   (AB 865)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

708.

(a) No person shall engage in the business of, act in the capacity of, advertise as, or assume to act as a broker or salesperson within this state without first obtaining a license under this article to do so.

(b) Only the person to whom a license is issued may perform or offer to perform any act subject to this article.

(c) No fictitious name shall be used by a broker in the conduct of any business for which a license is required under this article, unless a license bearing that fictitious name has been issued to the broker.

(d) The department shall not issue a license under a fictitious business name which is the same as or similar to the fictitious business name on a license previously issued and in effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 561, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

709.

No licensed broker or licensed salesman shall practice any fraud or deceit or make any fraudulent or grossly negligent representation with respect to any act for which a license is required under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 630, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

710.

The definitions of “broker” and “salesperson,” as set forth in Section 701, do not include the following:

(a) A person who directly performs any act subject to this article with reference to a yacht owned by that person or, in the case of a corporation which, through its regular officers receiving no special compensation therefor, performs any act subject to this article with reference to the corporation’s yacht.

(b) Services rendered by an attorney at law in performing duties as an attorney at law.

(c) Any receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, or other person acting under the order of any court.

(d) Any transaction involving the sale of property subject to foreclosure of a security interest in a yacht which is conducted only by the holder of the security interest or by a person licensed pursuant to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 7500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code when liquidating repossessed collateral pursuant to the written request of the holder of the security interest.

(e) Any transaction involving the sale, lease, or rental of a yacht in excess of 300 gross tons or tenders thereof sold at the same time.

(f) Any transaction involving the sale, lease, or rental of a new yacht or ship.

(g) Any transaction in the regular course of business by a wholesale motor vehicle auction subject to regulation by the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 526, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

711.

No person engaged in the business or acting in the capacity of a licensed broker or salesman within this state shall bring or maintain any action in the courts of this state for the collection of compensation for the performance of any of the acts mentioned in this article without alleging and proving that he was a duly licensed broker or licensed salesman at the time the alleged cause of action arose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

712.

(a) No licensed broker shall employ or compensate, directly or indirectly, any person for performing any of the acts within the scope of this article who is not a licensed broker or salesman licensed under the broker employing or compensating him or her, except that a licensed broker may pay a commission to a broker of another state or country.

(b) No salesman shall accept compensation for performing any of the acts within the scope of this article from any person other than the broker under whom the salesman is at the time licensed.

(c) No licensed salesman shall pay any compensation for performing any of the acts within the scope of this article to any broker licensed under this article, except through the licensed broker under whom the salesman is at the time licensed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 630, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

713.

Nothing contained in this article shall preclude a partnership from performing acts for which a broker’s license is required, provided every partner through whom the partnership so acts is a licensed broker.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

714.
